Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.005

Condemnation final actions—Notice requirements.

Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice requirements of RCW 8.25.290. Compliance with RCW 8.25.290 is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 68 s 5.]